Vermont statutes. Title 7 Alcoholic Beverages, Cannabis, and Tobacco
Subchapter 5. Manufacturing and Distribution of Alcohol

§ 271.
Manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant a manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license upon application and payment of the fee provided in section 204 of this title that permits the license holder to operate a facility that manufactures or rectifies:
(a) (1) The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant a manufacturer’s or rectifier’s license upon application and payment of the fee provided in section 204 of this title that permits the license holder to operate a facility that manufactures or rectifies:

malt beverages;

vinous beverages and fortified wines; or

spirits and fortified wines.

A manufacturer or rectifier shall obtain a separate license for each facility at which it manufactures or rectifies alcoholic beverages.

Except as otherwise provided in section 224 of this title and subsections (d)-(f) of this section:

spirits and fortified wine may be manufactured for sale to the Board of Liquor and Lottery or for export, or both; and

malt beverages and vinous beverages may be manufactured or rectified for sale to packagers or wholesale dealers, or for export, or both.

A licensed manufacturer of vinous beverages or fortified wines may receive from another manufacturer licensed in or outside this State bulk shipments of vinous beverages to rectify with the licensee’s own product, provided that the vinous beverages or fortified wines produced by the licensed manufacturer may contain no more than 25 percent imported vinous beverages.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant to a licensed manufacturer or rectifier a first-class license or a third-class license, or both, permitting the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages to the public at an establishment located at the manufacturer’s or rectifier’s licensed facility, provided the manufacturer or rectifier owns or has direct control over that establishment.
(d) (1) The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant to a licensed manufacturer or rectifier a first-class license or a third-class license, or both, permitting the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages to the public at an establishment located at the manufacturer’s or rectifier’s licensed facility, provided the manufacturer or rectifier owns or has direct control over that establishment.

A licensed manufacturer of malt beverages may operate up to two licensed establishments pursuant to this subsection that are located at the licensed manufacturing facility or on property that is owned by the licensee and is contiguous with the parcel of land on which the licensed manufacturing facility is located, provided the manufacturer owns or has direct control over both establishments.

[Repealed.]

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant a licensed manufacturer of malt beverages a second-class license permitting the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages to the public anywhere on the premises of the licensed manufacturing facility.

A licensed manufacturer or rectifier may serve alcoholic beverages with or without charge at an event held at the licensed manufacturing or rectifying facility or at a location on property that is owned by the licensee and is contiguous with the parcel of land on which the licensed facility is located, provided the licensee at least five days before the event gives the Division written notice of the event, including details required by the Division.
(f) (1) A licensed manufacturer or rectifier may serve alcoholic beverages with or without charge at an event held at the licensed manufacturing or rectifying facility or at a location on property that is owned by the licensee and is contiguous with the parcel of land on which the licensed facility is located, provided the licensee at least five days before the event gives the Division written notice of the event, including details required by the Division.

Any beverages not manufactured by the licensee that are served at the event shall be purchased on invoice from a licensed manufacturer or wholesale dealer or the Board of Liquor and Lottery.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 56; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 56;

2019, No. 73

, § 49;

2019, No. 73

, § 50, eff. July 1, 2021.

§ 272.
Packager’s license.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant a packager’s license to a person if the person:

submits an application;

pays the fee provided in section 204 of this title; and

satisfies the Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery as to its compliance with the rules of the Board relating to the cleanliness of the applicant’s facilities for storage and bottling of alcoholic beverages.

A packager’s license holder may:

bottle or otherwise package alcoholic beverages the licensee receives in bulk for sale; and

distribute and sell alcoholic beverages that are bottled or otherwise packaged for sale by the licensee.

A packager’s license holder shall comply with the provisions of subsection 274(c) of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 33, eff. March 1, 1961;

2017, No. 83

, § 40;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 57.

§ 273.
Wholesale dealer’s license.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant a wholesale dealer’s license to a person if the person:

submits an application on a form required by the Board;

pays the fee provided in section 204 of this title; and

satisfies the Board as to its qualifications as a wholesale dealer.

A wholesale dealer’s license holder may distribute or sell malt beverages or vinous beverages to first- and second-class licensees and holders of educational sampling event permits.

In no event shall a wholesale dealer’s license holder be permitted to carry on business allowed by a first-class license or second-class license.
(c) (1) In no event shall a wholesale dealer’s license holder be permitted to carry on business allowed by a first-class license or second-class license.

A wholesale dealer’s license holder shall comply with the provisions of subsection 274(c) of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

2017, No. 83

, § 42;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 58.

§ 274.
Certificate of approval for distribution of malt or vinous beverages.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant to a manufacturer or distributor of malt or vinous beverages that is not licensed under the provisions of this title a certificate of approval if the manufacturer or distributor does all of the following:

Submits an application on a form prescribed by the Board, including any additional information that the Board may deem necessary.

Agrees to comply with the rules of the Board.

Pays the fee provided in section 204 of this title to the Division of Liquor Control by a certified check payable to the State of Vermont or another form of payment approved by the Board of Liquor and Lottery. If the Board does not grant the application, the certified check or payment shall be returned to the applicant.

A certificate of approval shall permit the holder to export malt or vinous beverages, or sell malt or vinous beverages to holders of packagers’ or wholesale dealers’ licenses issued under section 272 or 273 of this title, or both.

A holder of a packager’s or a wholesale dealer’s license issued under this title shall not purchase within or outside the State, or import or cause to be imported into the State, any malt or vinous beverages unless the person, manufacturer, or distributor from which the beverages are obtained holds a valid certificate of approval or packager’s license.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may suspend or revoke a certificate of approval if the holder fails to comply with the rules of the Board or to submit reports to the Commissioner of Taxes in accordance with all applicable laws and rules.
(d) (1) The Board of Liquor and Lottery may suspend or revoke a certificate of approval if the holder fails to comply with the rules of the Board or to submit reports to the Commissioner of Taxes in accordance with all applicable laws and rules.

A certificate of approval shall not be revoked unless the holder has been given a hearing following reasonable notice.
(2) (A) A certificate of approval shall not be revoked unless the holder has been given a hearing following reasonable notice.

Notice of a revocation or suspension shall be sent to each holder of a packager’s or wholesale dealer’s license prior to the effective date of the revocation or suspension.

A person who violates a provision of this section shall be fined not more than $750.00 or imprisoned not more than one year, or both, for each offense and shall forfeit any license issued under the provisions of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 58; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 59;

2019, No. 73

, § 7.

§ 275.
Solicitor’s license.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant an individual a solicitor’s license if he or she does all of the following:

Submits an application to the Board of Liquor and Lottery on a form prescribed by the Board. The application shall include, at a minimum, the name, residence, and business address of the applicant; the name and address of the vendor, manufacturer, or employer to be represented by the applicant; and an agreement by the applicant to comply with the rules of the Board.

Submits to the Board a recommendation by the vendor, manufacturer, or employer to be represented by the applicant that indicates the applicant is qualified to hold a solicitor’s license.

Pays the fee provided in section 204 of this title to the Division of Liquor Control by certified check made payable to the State of Vermont. The certified check shall be returned to the applicant if the Board does not grant him or her a license under this section.

A solicitor’s license holder may, by canvassing or interviewing holders of licenses issued under the provisions of this title:

solicit orders for and promote the sale of malt or vinous beverages; and

promote the sale of spirits and fortified wines.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may suspend or revoke a solicitor’s license for failure to comply with any rule of the Board or for other cause. A solicitor’s license shall not be revoked until the license holder has had an opportunity for a hearing following reasonable notice.

A person who solicits, or attempts to solicit, orders for malt or vinous beverages, or promotes, or attempts to promote, the sale of malt or vinous beverages, spirits, or fortified wines by canvassing or interviewing a holder of a license issued under the provisions of this title, without having first obtained a solicitor’s license as provided in this section, or who makes a false or fraudulent statement or representation in an application for the license or in connection with an application shall be imprisoned not more than six months or fined not more than $500.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 60; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 60;

2019, No. 73

, § 18.

§ 276.
Industrial alcohol distributor’s license.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may grant an industrial alcohol distributor’s license upon application and payment of the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

Alcohol sold under an industrial alcohol distributor’s license may only be used for manufacturing, mechanical, medicinal, and scientific purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 61; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 61.

§ 277.
Malt and vinous beverage consumer shipping license.

A manufacturer or rectifier of malt or vinous beverages licensed in Vermont may be granted an in-state consumer shipping license by filing with the Division of Liquor Control an application in a form required by the Commissioner accompanied by a copy of the applicant’s current Vermont manufacturer’s license and the fee provided in section 204 of this title.
(a) (1) A manufacturer or rectifier of malt or vinous beverages licensed in Vermont may be granted an in-state consumer shipping license by filing with the Division of Liquor Control an application in a form required by the Commissioner accompanied by a copy of the applicant’s current Vermont manufacturer’s license and the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

An in-state consumer shipping license may be renewed annually by submitting to the Division the fee provided in section 204 of this title accompanied by a copy of the licensee’s current Vermont manufacturer’s license.

A manufacturer or rectifier of malt or vinous beverages licensed in another state that operates a brewery or winery in the United States and holds valid state and federal permits and licenses may be granted an out-of-state consumer shipping license by filing with the Division of Liquor Control an application in a form required by the Commissioner accompanied by copies of the applicant’s current out-of-state manufacturer’s license and the fee provided in section 204 of this title.
(b) (1) A manufacturer or rectifier of malt or vinous beverages licensed in another state that operates a brewery or winery in the United States and holds valid state and federal permits and licenses may be granted an out-of-state consumer shipping license by filing with the Division of Liquor Control an application in a form required by the Commissioner accompanied by copies of the applicant’s current out-of-state manufacturer’s license and the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

An out-of-state consumer shipping license may be renewed annually by submitting to the Division the fee provided in section 204 of this title accompanied by the licensee’s current out-of-state manufacturer’s license.

As used in this section, “out-of-state” means any state other than Vermont, any territory or possession of the United States, and does not include a foreign country.

A consumer shipping license granted pursuant to this section shall permit the licensee to ship malt or vinous beverages produced by the licensee to private residents for personal use and not for resale.
(c) (1) A consumer shipping license granted pursuant to this section shall permit the licensee to ship malt or vinous beverages produced by the licensee to private residents for personal use and not for resale.

A licensee shall not ship more than 12 cases of malt beverages containing no more than 36 gallons of malt beverages or no more than 12 cases of vinous beverages containing no more than 29 gallons of vinous beverages to any one Vermont resident in any calendar year.

The beverages shall be shipped by common carrier certified by the Division pursuant to section 280 of this subchapter. The common carrier shall comply with all the following:

deliver beverages pursuant to an invoice that includes the name of the licensee and the name and address of the purchaser;

on delivery, require a valid authorized form of identification, as defined in section 589 of this title, from a recipient who appears to be under 30 years of age; and

require the recipient to sign an electronic or paper form or other acknowledgment of receipt.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 62; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 62.

§ 278.
Vinous beverage retail shipping license.

A manufacturer or rectifier of vinous beverages that is licensed in the State or outside the State and holds valid state and federal permits and operates a winery in the United States may apply for a retail shipping license by filing with the Division of Liquor Control an application in a form required by the Commissioner accompanied by a copy of its in-state or out-of-state license and the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

The retail shipping license may be renewed annually by submitting to the Division the fee provided in section 204 of this title accompanied by the licensee’s current in-state or out-of-state manufacturer’s license.

A retail shipping license holder, including the holder’s affiliates, franchises, and subsidiaries, may sell up to 5,000 gallons of vinous beverages per year directly to first- or second-class licensees and deliver the beverages by common carrier, the manufacturer’s or rectifier’s own vehicle, or the vehicle of an employee of a manufacturer or rectifier, provided that the beverages are sold on invoice, and no more than 100 gallons per month are sold to any single first- or second-class licensee.

The retail shipping license holder shall provide to the Division documentation of the annual and monthly number of gallons sold.

Vinous beverages sold under this section may be delivered by the vehicle of a second-class license holder if the second-class licensee cannot obtain the vinous beverages from a wholesale dealer.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 63; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 63.

§ 279.
Consumer and retail shipping licenses; general requirements.

A holder of a shipping license granted pursuant to section 277 or 278 of this subchapter shall comply with all of the following:

Ensure that all containers of alcoholic beverages are shipped in a container that is clearly labeled: “contains alcohol; signature of individual 21 years of age or older required for delivery.”

Not ship to any address in a municipality that the Division of Liquor Control identifies as having voted to be “dry.”

Retain a copy of each record of sale for a minimum of five years from the date of shipping.

Report at least twice per year to the Division if a holder of a consumer shipping license and once per year if a holder of a retail shipping license in a manner and form required by the Commissioner all the following information:

the total amount of malt or vinous beverages shipped into or within the State during the preceding six months if a holder of a consumer shipping license or during the preceding 12 months if a holder of a retail shipping license;

the names and addresses of the purchasers to whom the beverages were shipped; and

the date purchased, the quantity and value of each shipment, and, if applicable, the name of the common carrier used to make each delivery.

Pay to the Commissioner of Taxes the tax required pursuant to section 421 of this title on the malt or vinous beverages shipped pursuant to this subchapter and comply with the provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 233,

24 V.S.A. § 138

, and any other legally authorized local sales taxes. Delivery in this State shall be deemed to constitute a sale in this State at the place of delivery and shall be subject to all appropriate taxes levied by the State of Vermont.

Permit the State Treasurer, the Division of Liquor Control, and the Department of Taxes, separately or jointly, upon request, to perform an audit of its records.

If an out-of-state license holder, be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the Board of Liquor and Lottery, Division of Liquor Control, or any other State agency and the Vermont State courts concerning enforcement of this or other applicable laws and rules.

Not have any direct or indirect financial interest in a Vermont wholesale dealer or retail dealer, including a first-, second-, or third-class licensee.

Comply with all applicable laws and Board of Liquor and Lottery rules.

Comply with the beverage container deposit redemption system pursuant to 10 V.S.A. chapter 53.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 64; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 64.

§ 280.
Common carriers; requirements.

A common carrier shall not deliver malt or vinous beverages pursuant to this chapter until it has complied with the training provisions in section 213 of this title and been certified by the Division of Liquor Control.

No employee of a certified common carrier may deliver malt or vinous beverages until that employee completes the training required pursuant to subsection 213(c) of this title.

A certified common carrier shall deliver only malt or vinous beverages that have been shipped by the holder of a license issued under section 277 or 278 of this subchapter or vinous beverages that have been shipped by the holder of a vinous beverage storage license issued under section 283 of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 65; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 65.

§ 281.
Prohibitions.

Except as otherwise provided in section 226 of this title, direct shipments of malt or vinous beverages are prohibited if the shipment is not specifically authorized and in compliance with sections 277-280 of this subchapter.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 226 of this title, direct shipments of malt or vinous beverages are prohibited if the shipment is not specifically authorized and in compliance with sections 277-280 of this subchapter.

Any person who knowingly makes, participates in, imports, or receives a direct shipment of malt or vinous beverages from a person who does not hold a license, permit, or certificate pursuant to sections 226 or 277-280 of this title may be fined not more than $2,500.00 or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

The holder of a license issued pursuant to section 277 or 278 of this title or a common carrier that ships malt or vinous beverages to an individual under 21 years of age shall be fined not less than $1,000.00 or more than $3,000.00 or imprisoned not more than two years, or both.

For any violation of sections 277-280 of this subchapter, the Board of Liquor and Lottery may suspend or revoke a license issued under section 277 or 278 of this subchapter, in addition to any other remedies available to the Board.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 66; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 66;

2019, No. 73

, § 8.

§ 282.
Rulemaking.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery and the Commissioner of Taxes may adopt rules and forms necessary to implement sections 277-281 of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 83

, § 67; amended

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 67.

§ 283.
Vinous beverage storage and shipping license.

The Board of Liquor and Lottery may, pursuant to rules adopted by the Board, grant a vinous beverage storage and shipping license to a person that submits an application and pays the fee provided in section 204 of this title.

A vinous beverage storage and shipping licensee may operate a climate-controlled storage facility in which vinous beverages owned by another person are stored for a fee and may transport vinous beverages on which all applicable taxes already have been paid.
(b) (1) A vinous beverage storage and shipping licensee may operate a climate-controlled storage facility in which vinous beverages owned by another person are stored for a fee and may transport vinous beverages on which all applicable taxes already have been paid.

A vinous beverage storage facility may also accept shipments from any licensed in-state or out-of-state vinous beverage manufacturer that has an in-state or out-of-state consumer shipping license pursuant to section 277 of this title.

Vinous beverages stored by the licensee may be transported only for shipment to the owner of the beverages or to another licensed vinous beverage storage facility, and the beverages shall be shipped only by common carrier in compliance with section 280 of this title.

A person granted a license pursuant to this section may not sell or resell any vinous beverages stored at the storage facility.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 19, 2008; amended

2017, No. 83

, § 68;

2018, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § 68.